Florida, session 2026, SB548.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 42 43 Section 1.âPresent subsections (39) through (54) of section 44 163.3164, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (40) 45 through (55), respectively, and a new subsection (39) is added 46 to that section, to read: 47 163.3164âCommunity Planning Act; definitions.âAs used in 48 this act: 49 (39)ââPlan-based methodologyâ means a study methodology 50 that uses the most recent and localized data to project growth 51 within a jurisdiction over a 10-year period, anticipate capacity 52 impacts on relevant systems which will be created by the 53 projected growth, and establish a list of capital projects to be 54 constructed or purchased in a defined time period to mitigate 55 the anticipated capacity impacts as part of a new or updated 56 impact fee study. The capital projects identified in the study 57 and any necessary interlocal agreement must comport with the 58 requirements of s. 163.3177(6)(h). 59 Section 2.âParagraph (h) of subsection (6) of section 60 163.3177, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 61 163.3177âRequired and optional elements of comprehensive 62 plan; studies and surveys.â 63 (6)âIn addition to the requirements of subsections (1)-(5), 64 the comprehensive plan shall include the following elements: 65 (h)1.âAn intergovernmental coordination element showing 66 relationships and stating principles and guidelines to be used 67 in coordinating the adopted comprehensive plan with the plans of 68 school boards, regional water supply authorities, and other 69 units of local government providing services but not having 70 regulatory authority over the use of land, with the 71 comprehensive plans of adjacent municipalities, the county, 72 adjacent counties, or the region, with the state comprehensive 73 plan and with the applicable regional water supply plan approved 74 pursuant to s. 373.709, as the case may require and as such 75 adopted plans or plans in preparation may exist. This element of 76 the local comprehensive plan must demonstrate consideration of 77 the particular effects of the local plan, when adopted, upon the 78 development of adjacent municipalities, the county, adjacent 79 counties, or the region, or upon the state comprehensive plan, 80 as the case may require. 81 a.âThe intergovernmental coordination element must provide 82 procedures for identifying and implementing joint planning 83 areas, especially for the purpose of annexation, municipal 84 incorporation, and joint infrastructure service areas. 85 b.âThe intergovernmental coordination element shall provide 86 for a dispute resolution process, as established pursuant to s. 87 186.509, for bringing intergovernmental disputes to closure in a 88 timely manner. 89 c.âThe intergovernmental coordination element shall provide 90 for interlocal agreements as established pursuant to s. 91 333.03(1)(b). 92 2.âThe intergovernmental coordination element shall also 93 state principles and guidelines to be used in coordinating the 94 adopted comprehensive plan with the plans of school boards and 95 other units of local government providing facilities and 96 services but not having regulatory authority over the use of 97 land. In addition, the intergovernmental coordination element 98 must describe joint processes for collaborative planning and 99 decisionmaking on population projections and public school 100 siting, the location and extension of public facilities subject 101 to concurrency, and siting facilities with countywide 102 significance, including locally unwanted land uses whose nature 103 and identity are established in an agreement. 104 3.âWithin 1 year after adopting their intergovernmental 105 coordination elements, each county, all the municipalities 106 within that county, the district school board, and any unit of 107 local government service providers in that county shall 108 establish by interlocal or other formal agreement executed by 109 all affected entities, the joint processes described in this 110 subparagraph consistent with their adopted intergovernmental 111 coordination elements. The agreement must: 112 a.âEnsure that the local government addresses through 113 coordination mechanisms the impacts of development proposed in 114 the local comprehensive plan upon development in adjacent 115 municipalities, the county, adjacent counties, the region, and 116 the state. The area of concern for municipalities shall include 117 adjacent municipalities, the county, and counties adjacent to 118 the municipality. The area of concern for counties shall include 119 all municipalities within the county, adjacent counties, and 120 adjacent municipalities. Such coordination mechanisms must 121 include plans to provide mitigation funding to address any 122 extrajurisdictional impacts of development, consistent with the 123 requirements of s. 163.3180(5)(j). 124 b.âEnsure coordination in establishing level of service 125 standards for public facilities with any state, regional, or 126 local entity having operational and maintenance responsibility 127 for such facilities. 128 Section 3.âParagraph (j) of subsection (5) of section 129 163.3180, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 130 163.3180âConcurrency.â 131 (5) 132 (j)1.âIf a county and municipality charge the developer of 133 a new development or redevelopment a fee for transportation 134 capacity impacts, the county and municipality must create and 135 execute an interlocal agreement to coordinate the mitigation of 136 their respective transportation capacity impacts. 137 2.âThe interlocal agreement must, at a minimum: 138 a.âEnsure that any new development or redevelopment is not 139 charged twice for the same transportation capacity impacts. 140 b.âEstablish a plan-based methodology for determining the 141 legally permissible fee to be charged to a new development or 142 redevelopment. 143 c.âRequire the county or municipality issuing the building 144 permit to collect the fee, unless agreed to otherwise. 145 d.âProvide a method for the proportionate distribution of 146 the revenue collected by the county or municipality to address 147 the transportation capacity impacts of a new development or 148 redevelopment, or provide a method of assigning responsibility 149 for the mitigation of the transportation capacity impacts 150 belonging to the county and the municipality. 151 e.âUse a plan-based methodology in complying with the 152 requirements of s. 163.3177(6)(h). 153 3.âBy October 1, 2025, if an interlocal agreement is not 154 executed pursuant to this paragraph: 155 a.âThe fee charged to a new development or redevelopment 156 shall be based on the transportation capacity impacts 157 apportioned to the county and municipality as identified in the 158 developerâs traffic impact study or the mobility plan adopted by 159 the county or municipality. 160 b.âThe developer shall receive a 10 percent reduction in 161 the total fee calculated pursuant to sub-subparagraph a. 162 c.âThe county or municipality issuing the building permit 163 must collect the fee charged pursuant to sub-subparagraphs a. 164 and b. and distribute the proceeds of such fee to the county and 165 municipality within 60 days after the developerâs payment. 166 4.âThis paragraph does not apply to: 167 a.âA county as defined in s. 125.011(1). 168 b.âA county or municipality that has entered into, or 169 otherwise updated, an existing interlocal agreement, as of 170 October 1, 2024, to coordinate the mitigation of transportation 171 impacts. However, if such existing interlocal agreement is 172 terminated, the affected county and municipality that have 173 entered into the agreement are shall be subject to the 174 requirements of this paragraph. An interlocal agreement entered 175 into before October 1, 2024, may not extend beyond October 1, 176 2031 unless the county and municipality mutually agree to extend 177 the existing interlocal agreement before the expiration of the 178 agreement. 179 Section 4.âPresent paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (3) 180 of section 163.31801, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 181 paragraphs (b) and (c), respectively, a new paragraph (a) is 182 added to that subsection, and paragraph (g) of subsection (6) 183 and subsection (9) of that section are amended, to read: 184 163.31801âImpact fees; short title; intent; minimum 185 requirements; audits; challenges.â 186 (3)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 187 (a)ââExtraordinary circumstancesâ means measurable effects 188 of development which will require mitigation by the affected 189 local government, school district, or special district and which 190 exceed the total of the current adopted impact fee amount and 191 any increase as provided in paragraphs (6)(c), (d), and (e) in 192 less than 4 years. 193 (6)âA local government, school district, or special 194 district may increase an impact fee only as provided in this 195 subsection. 196 (g)1.âA local government, school district, or special 197 district may increase an impact fee rate beyond the phase-in 198 limitations established under paragraph (b), paragraph (c), 199 paragraph (d), or paragraph (e) by establishing the need for 200 such increase in full compliance with the requirements of 201 subsection (4), provided the following criteria are met: 202 a.âA demonstrated-need study using a plan-based methodology 203 which justifies justifying any increase in excess of those 204 authorized in paragraph (b), paragraph (c), paragraph (d), or 205 paragraph (e) has been completed within the 12 months before the 206 adoption of the impact fee increase and expressly demonstrates 207 the extraordinary circumstances necessitating the need to exceed 208 the phase-in limitations. The capacity standards used to support 209 the existence of such extraordinary circumstances must be 210 specified in the impact fee study adopted under paragraph 211 (4)(a). The demonstrated-need study must be accompanied by a 212 declaration stating how and the timeframe during which the 213 proposed impact fee increase will be used to construct or 214 purchase the improvements necessary to increase capacity. The 215 local government, school district, or special district must use 216 localized data reflecting differences in costs and modality of 217 projects between urban, emerging urban, and rural areas, as 218 applicable within the study area, to project the anticipated 219 growth or capacity impacts which underlie the extraordinary 220 circumstances necessitating the impact fee increase. 221 b.âThe local government jurisdiction has held at least two 222 publicly noticed workshops dedicated to the extraordinary 223 circumstances necessitating the need to exceed the phase-in 224 limitations set forth in paragraph (b), paragraph (c), paragraph 225 (d), or paragraph (e). 226 c.âThe impact fee increase ordinance is approved by a 227 unanimous vote of the governing body. 228 2.âAn impact fee increase approved under this paragraph 229 must be implemented in at least two but not more than four equal 230 annual increments beginning with the date on which the impact 231 fee increase ordinance is adopted. 232 3.âA local government, school district, or special district 233 may not: 234 a.âIncrease an impact fee rate beyond the phase-in 235 limitations under this paragraph if the local government, school 236 district, or special district has not increased the impact fee 237 within the past 5 years. Any year in which the local government, 238 school district, or special district is prohibited from 239 increasing an impact fee because the jurisdiction is in a 240 hurricane disaster area is not included in the 5-year period. 241 b.âUse data that is older than 4 years to demonstrate 242 extraordinary circumstances. 243 c.âInclude in the impact fee increase any deduction 244 authorized by a previous or existing impact fee. 245 d.âIncrease an impact fee rate beyond the phase-in 246 limitations under this paragraph by more than 100 percent 247 divided equally over a 4-year period. 248 (9)âIn any action challenging an impact fee or the 249 governmentâs failure to provide required dollar-for-dollar 250 credits for the payment of impact fees as provided in s. 251 163.3180(6)(h)2.b.:, 252 (a)âThe government has the burden of proving by a 253 preponderance of the evidence that the imposition or amount of 254 the fee or credit meets the requirements of state legal 255 precedent and this section. The court may not use a deferential 256 standard for the benefit of the government. If the court 257 determines that the petitioner made an overpayment due to an 258 improperly assessed impact fee, the petitioner is entitled to a 259 refund in the amount of the overpayment with interest, with such 260 interest amount determined by the court. The local government, 261 school district, or special district that assessed the impact 262 fee must issue the refund within 90 days after the judgment 263 becomes final. 264 (b)âA prevailing petitioner who is a resident of or an 265 owner of a business located within the jurisdiction of the local 266 government, school district, or special district that imposed 267 the impact fee in violation of this section is entitled to 268 reasonable attorney fees and costs. Such petitioner is further 269 entitled to reasonable attorney fees and costs in any subsequent 270 action necessary to collect a refund ordered by the court for 271 any impact fee overpayment. 272 Section 5.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 273 212.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 274 212.055âDiscretionary sales surtaxes; legislative intent; 275 authorization and use of proceeds.âIt is the legislative intent 276 that any authorization for imposition of a discretionary sales 277 surtax shall be published in the Florida Statutes as a 278 subsection of this section, irrespective of the duration of the 279 levy. Each enactment shall specify the types of counties 280 authorized to levy; the rate or rates which may be imposed; the 281 maximum length of time the surtax may be imposed, if any; the 282 procedure which must be followed to secure voter approval, if 283 required; the purpose for which the proceeds may be expended; 284 and such other requirements as the Legislature may provide. 285 Taxable transactions and administrative procedures shall be as 286 provided in s. 212.054. 287 (2)âLOCAL GOVERNMENT INFRASTRUCTURE SURTAX.â 288 (d)âThe proceeds of the surtax authorized by this 289 subsection and any accrued interest shall be expended by the 290 school district, within the county and municipalities within the 291 county, or, in the case of a negotiated joint county agreement, 292 within another county, to finance, plan, and construct 293 infrastructure; to acquire any interest in land for public 294 recreation, conservation, or protection of natural resources or 295 to prevent or satisfy private property rights claims resulting 296 from limitations imposed by the designation of an area of 297 critical state concern; to provide loans, grants, or rebates to 298 residential or commercial property owners who make energy 299 efficiency improvements to their residential or commercial 300 property, if a local government ordinance authorizing such use 301 is approved by referendum; or to finance the closure of county 302 owned or municipally owned solid waste landfills that have been 303 closed or are required to be closed by order of the Department 304 of Environmental Protection. Any use of the proceeds or interest 305 for purposes of landfill closure before July 1, 1993, is 306 ratified. The proceeds and any interest may not be used for the 307 operational expenses of infrastructure, except that a county 308 that has a population of fewer than 75,000 and that is required 309 to close a landfill may use the proceeds or interest for long 310 term maintenance costs associated with landfill closure. 311 Counties, as defined in s. 125.011, and charter counties may, in 312 addition, use the proceeds or interest to retire or service 313 indebtedness incurred for bonds issued before July 1, 1987, for 314 infrastructure purposes, and for bonds subsequently issued to 315 refund such bonds. Any use of the proceeds or interest for 316 purposes of retiring or servicing indebtedness incurred for 317 refunding bonds before July 1, 1999, is ratified. 318 1.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term 319 âinfrastructureâ means: 320 a.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 321 associated with the construction, reconstruction, or improvement 322 of public facilities that have a life expectancy of 5 or more 323 years, any related land acquisition, land improvement, design, 324 and engineering costs, and all other professional and related 325 costs required to bring the public facilities into service. For 326 purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term âpublic facilitiesâ 327 means facilities as defined in s. 163.3164(42) s. 163.3164(41), 328 s. 163.3221(13), or s. 189.012(5), and includes facilities that 329 are necessary to carry out governmental purposes, including, but 330 not limited to, fire stations, general governmental office 331 buildings, and animal shelters, regardless of whether the 332 facilities are owned by the local taxing authority or another 333 governmental entity. 334 b.âA fire department vehicle, an emergency medical service 335 vehicle, a sheriffâs office vehicle, a police department 336 vehicle, or any other vehicle, and the equipment necessary to 337 outfit the vehicle for its official use or equipment that has a 338 life expectancy of at least 5 years. 339 c.âAny expenditure for the construction, lease, or 340 maintenance of, or provision of utilities or security for, 341 facilities, as defined in s. 29.008. 342 d.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 343 associated with the improvement of private facilities that have 344 a life expectancy of 5 or more years and that the owner agrees 345 to make available for use on a temporary basis as needed by a 346 local government as a public emergency shelter or a staging area 347 for emergency response equipment during an emergency officially 348 declared by the state or by the local government under s. 349 252.38. Such improvements are limited to those necessary to 350 comply with current standards for public emergency evacuation 351 shelters. The owner must enter into a written contract with the 352 local government providing the improvement funding to make the 353 private facility available to the public for purposes of 354 emergency shelter at no cost to the local government for a 355 minimum of 10 years after completion of the improvement, with 356 the provision that the obligation will transfer to any 357 subsequent owner until the end of the minimum period. 358 e.âAny land acquisition expenditure for a residential 359 housing project in which at least 30 percent of the units are 360 affordable to individuals or families whose total annual 361 household income does not exceed 120 percent of the area median 362 income adjusted for household size, if the land is owned by a 363 local government or by a special district that enters into a 364 written agreement with the local government to provide such 365 housing. The local government or special district may enter into 366 a ground lease with a public or private person or entity for 367 nominal or other consideration for the construction of the 368 residential housing project on land acquired pursuant to this 369 sub-subparagraph. 370 f.âInstructional technology used solely in a school 371 districtâs classrooms. As used in this sub-subparagraph, the 372 term âinstructional technologyâ means an interactive device that 373 assists a teacher in instructing a class or a group of students 374 and includes the necessary hardware and software to operate the 375 interactive device. The term also includes support systems in 376 which an interactive device may mount and is not required to be 377 affixed to the facilities. 378 2.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term âenergy 379 efficiency improvementâ means any energy conservation and 380 efficiency improvement that reduces consumption through 381 conservation or a more efficient use of electricity, natural 382 gas, propane, or other forms of energy on the property, 383 including, but not limited to, air sealing; installation of 384 insulation; installation of energy-efficient heating, cooling, 385 or ventilation systems; installation of solar panels; building 386 modifications to increase the use of daylight or shade; 387 replacement of windows; installation of energy controls or 388 energy recovery systems; installation of electric vehicle 389 charging equipment; installation of systems for natural gas fuel 390 as defined in s. 206.9951; and installation of efficient 391 lighting equipment. 392 3.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, 393 a local government infrastructure surtax imposed or extended 394 after July 1, 1998, may allocate up to 15 percent of the surtax 395 proceeds for deposit into a trust fund within the countyâs 396 accounts created for the purpose of funding economic development 397 projects having a general public purpose of improving local 398 economies, including the funding of operational costs and 399 incentives related to economic development. The ballot statement 400 must indicate the intention to make an allocation under the 401 authority of this subparagraph. 402 4.âSurtax revenues that are shared with eligible charter 403 schools pursuant to paragraph (c) shall be allocated among such 404 schools based on each schoolâs proportionate share of total 405 school district capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment 406 as adopted by the education estimating conference established in 407 s. 216.136. Surtax revenues must be expended by the charter 408 school in a manner consistent with the allowable uses provided 409 in s. 1013.62(4). All revenues and expenditures shall be 410 accounted for in a charter schoolâs monthly or quarterly 411 financial statement pursuant to s. 1002.33(9). If a schoolâs 412 charter is not renewed or is terminated and the school is 413 dissolved under the provisions of law under which the school was 414 organized, any unencumbered funds received under this paragraph 415 shall revert to the sponsor. 416 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.